test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_UHL_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - k̲áaguhl - ENGLISH : # CLASS_UHL_STEM_2

     k̲áaguhl+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲áagulga
     k̲áaguhl+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲áagulgang
     k̲áaguhl+V+DIRECT+PAST: k̲áagulgan
     k̲áaguhl+V+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áagul.ang
     k̲áaguhl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲áagulgang
     k̲áaguhl+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲áagulganggang
     k̲áaguhl+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áagulgangang
     k̲áaguhl+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áagulgiinii
     k̲áaguhl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áagulgaangaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áagulgaangaan
     k̲áaguhl+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲áagulang k̲asa'áa
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲áagulang k̲asa'áang
     k̲áaguhl+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲áagulang k̲asaasdláa
     k̲áaguhl+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲áagulang k̲asaasdláang
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲áagulgang'waa
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲áagulgang'waang
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áagulgang'waa.ang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲áagulgang'anggang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áagulgang'angang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲áagulang k̲asaa'áng
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲áagulang k̲asaa'ánggang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲áagulang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲áagulang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲áagulgang'ang'waa
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲áagulgang'ang'waang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áagulgang'ang'waa.ang
